Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-257.01
School lands; priorities for sale; request to sell.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall review and set priorities for the sale of lands covered by leases expiring each year, giving the highest priority to those lands which it determines, considering all relevant factors, can be sold to the best advantage. Any leaseholder or other interested party may request that the land covered by any expiring lease be offered for sale, and the board shall give consideration to such request in deciding whether to offer such land for sale.

Laws 1973, LB 145, § 2.